Nebraska, session 109, LB733.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB733 LB733
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 43-4413, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-4413 (1) There is hereby established a child welfare practice
model work group. The work group may include, but is not limited to:
(a) The Director of Behavioral Health of the Division of Behavioral
Health or the director's designee;
(b) The Director of Children and Family Services of the Division of
Children and Family Services or the director's designee;
(c) The Director of Disability and Aging Developmental Disabilities
of the Division of Disability and Aging Developmental Disabilities or the
director's designee;
(d) The Director of Medicaid and Long-Term Care of the Division of
Medicaid and Long-Term Care or the director's designee;
(e) The Director of Public Health of the Division of Public Health
or the director's designee;
(f) The Commissioner of Education or the commissioner's designee;
(g) The State Court Administrator;
(h) A representative of the state judicial branch to be appointed by
the Chief Justice; and
(i) Representatives from each federally recognized Indian tribe
within the State of Nebraska, appointed by each tribe's Tribal Council or
Executive Committee.
(2) The work group shall develop a practice and finance model for
child welfare system transformation in Nebraska, with consultation from
key stakeholders, judges from separate juvenile courts and judges of
county courts sitting as juvenile courts, private child welfare
providers, individuals with lived experience in the child welfare system,
the Nebraska Children's Commission, the Inspector General of Nebraska
Child Welfare, the Foster Care Review Office, child advocacy centers, law
enforcement, and county attorneys. The practice and finance model shall
include, but not be limited to:
-2-

LB733 LB733
2026 2026
(a) Development of a statewide mission and vision for the child
welfare system in Nebraska;
(b) Development of values and practice priorities for the child
welfare system in Nebraska;
(c) Development of statewide program goals and a practice and
finance model for child welfare system case management and service
delivery;
(d) Development of engagement strategies to support community
involvement in child welfare system transformation;
(e) Development of strategies that strengthen relationships across
the court system, probation, executive branch agencies, the State
Department of Education, and community partners;
(f) Development of strategies that support integration across
agencies;
(g) Development of accountabilities across the entire child welfare
system;
(h) Evaluation of the state's Title IV-E claiming practices and
identification of appropriate steps to optimize federal reimbursement for
child welfare system expenditures;
(i) Opportunities and financial mechanisms for providers to pilot
innovative solutions to meet program goals; and
(j) Development of a strategy for data collection and outcome
monitoring.
(3) The work group shall provide monthly updates to the strategic
leadership group.
Sec. 2. Section 68-1530, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
68-1530 (1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall apply
for a three-year medicaid waiver under section 1915(c) of the federal
Social Security Act to administer a family support program which is a
home and community-based services program as provided in this section.
-3-

LB733 LB733
2026 2026
(2)(a) The Advisory Committee on Developmental Disabilities created
in section 83-1212.01 shall assist in the development and guide the
implementation of the family support program. The family support program
shall be administered by the Division of Disability and Aging
Developmental Disabilities of the Department of Health and Human
Services.
(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that any funds distributed
to Nebraska pursuant to section 9817 of the federal American Rescue Plan
Act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, be used to eliminate unmet needs relating
to home and community-based services for persons with developmental
disabilities as much as is possible.
(c) If funds are distributed to Nebraska pursuant to section 9817 of
the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, it is the intent of the
Legislature that such funds distributed to Nebraska should at least
partially fund the family support program if doing so is in accordance
with federal law, rules, regulations, or guidance.
(3) The family support program shall:
(a) Offer an annual capped budget for long-term services and
supports of ten thousand dollars for each eligible applicant;
(b) Offer a pathway for medicaid eligibility for disabled children
by disregarding parental income and establishing eligibility based on a
child's income and assets;
(c) Allow a family to self-direct services, including contracting
for services and supports approved by the division; and
(d) Not exceed eight hundred fifty participants.
(4) The department, in consultation with the advisory committee,
shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation
of the family support program to be set at an intermediate care facility
institutional level of care to support children with intellectual and
developmental disabilities and their families. Such rules and regulations
shall include, but not be limited to:
-4-

LB733 LB733
2026 2026
(a) Criteria for and types of long-term services and supports to be
provided by the family support program;
(b) The method, as provided in section 68-1532, for allocating
resources to family units participating in the family support program;
(c) Eligibility determination, including, but not limited to, a
child's maximum income and assets;
(d) The enrollment process;
(e) Limits on benefits; and
(f) Processes to establish quality assurance, including, but not
limited to, measures of family satisfaction.
(5) The division shall administer the family support program within
the limits of the appropriations by the Legislature for such program.
(6) Until December 31, 2027, the division shall submit an annual
report electronically to the Legislature on the family support program.
The report shall include:
(a) The distribution of available funds, the total number of
children and families served, and the status of the waiting list for the
comprehensive waiver and other applicable waivers;
(b) A summary of any grievances filed by family units pertaining to
the family support program, including any appeals and a description of
how such grievances were resolved;
(c) The number and demographics of children with disabilities and
their families who applied under the family support program but who were
not found eligible and the reason such children and their families were
not found eligible;
(d) Quality assurance activities and the results of annual measures
of family satisfaction; and
(e) Recommendations to innovate the family support program, improve
current programming, and maximize limited funding, including, but not
limited to, the potential utilization of other medicaid pathways or
medicaid waivers that could help increase access to medicaid and long-
-5-

LB733 LB733
2026 2026
term services and supports for children with disabilities or special
health care needs.
Sec. 3. Section 81-1316, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-1316 (1) All agencies and personnel of state government shall be
covered by sections 81-1301 to 81-1319 and shall be considered subject to
the State Personnel System, except the following:
(a) All personnel of the office of the Governor;
(b) All personnel of the office of the Lieutenant Governor;
(c) All personnel of the office of the Secretary of State;
(d) All personnel of the office of the State Treasurer;
(e) All personnel of the office of the Attorney General;
(f) All personnel of the office of the Auditor of Public Accounts;
(g) All personnel of the Legislature;
(h) All personnel of the court systems;
(i) All personnel of the Board of Educational Lands and Funds;
(j) All personnel of the Public Service Commission;
(k) All personnel of the Nebraska Brand Committee;
(l) All personnel of the Commission of Industrial Relations;
(m) All personnel of the State Department of Education;
(n) All personnel of the Nebraska state colleges and the Board of
Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges;
(o) All personnel of the University of Nebraska;
(p) All personnel of the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary
Education;
(q) All personnel of the Governor's Policy Research Office;
(r) All personnel of the Commission on Public Advocacy;
(s) All agency heads;
(t)(i) The Director of Behavioral Health of the Division of
Behavioral Health; (ii) the Director of Children and Family Services of
the Division of Children and Family Services; (iii) the Director of
-6-

LB733 LB733
2026 2026
Disability and Aging Developmental Disabilities of the Division of
Disability and Aging Developmental Disabilities; (iv) the Director of
Medicaid and Long-Term Care of the Division of Medicaid and Long-Term
Care; and (v) the Director of Public Health of the Division of Public
Health;
(u) The chief medical officer established under section 81-3115, the
Administrator of the Office of Juvenile Services, and the chief executive
officers of the Beatrice State Developmental Center, Lincoln Regional
Center, Norfolk Regional Center, Hastings Regional Center, Central
Nebraska Veterans' Home, Norfolk Veterans' Home, Eastern Nebraska
Veterans' Home, Western Nebraska Veterans' Home, and each youth
rehabilitation and treatment center;
(v) The chief executive officers of all facilities operated by the
Department of Correctional Services and the medical director for the
department appointed pursuant to section 83-4,156;
(w) All personnel employed as pharmacists, physicians,
psychiatrists, or psychologists by the Department of Correctional
Services;
(x) All personnel employed as pharmacists, physicians,
psychiatrists, psychologists, service area administrators, or facility
operating officers of the Department of Health and Human Services or the
Department of Veterans' Affairs;
(y) Deputies and examiners of the Department of Banking and Finance
and the Department of Insurance as set forth in sections 8-105 and
44-119, except for those deputies and examiners who remain in the State
Personnel System;
(z) All personnel of the Tax Equalization and Review Commission;
(aa) The associate director of the Conservation Division of the
Nebraska State Historical Society and all personnel employed as a
Conservator I or Conservator II of the Conservation Division of the
Nebraska State Historical Society;
-7-

LB733 LB733
2026 2026
(bb) Assistant directors and deputies of the Nebraska Public
Employees Retirement Systems; and
(cc) The Chief Water Officer, assistant directors, and deputies of
the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment.
(2) At each agency head's discretion, up to the following number of
additional positions may be exempted from the State Personnel System,
based on the following agency size categories:
Number of Agency Number of Noncovered
Employees Positions
less than 25 0
25 to 100 1
101 to 250 2
251 to 500 3
501 to 1000 4
1001 to 2000 5
2001 to 3000 8
3001 to 4000 11
4001 to 5000 40
over 5000 50
The purpose of having such noncovered positions shall be to allow
agency heads the opportunity to recruit, hire, and supervise critical,
confidential, or policymaking personnel without restrictions from
selection procedures, compensation rules, career protections, and
grievance privileges. Persons holding the noncovered positions shall
serve at the pleasure of the agency head and shall be paid salaries set
by the agency head. An agency with over five thousand employees shall
provide notice in writing to the Health and Human Services Committee of
the Legislature when forty noncovered positions have been filled by the
agency head pursuant to this subsection.
(3) No changes to this section or to the number of noncovered
positions within an agency shall affect the status of personnel employed
-8-

LB733 LB733
2026 2026
on the date the changes become operative without their prior written
agreement. A state employee's career protections or coverage by personnel
rules and regulations shall not be revoked by redesignation of the
employee's position as a noncovered position without the prior written
agreement of such employee.
Sec. 4. Section 81-3113, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-3113 The Department of Health and Human Services is created. The
department shall have five divisions to be known as (1) the Division of
Behavioral Health, (2) the Division of Children and Family Services, (3)
the Division of Disability and Aging Developmental Disabilities, (4) the
Division of Medicaid and Long-Term Care, and (5) the Division of Public
Health.
Sec. 5. Section 81-3116, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-3116 The responsibilities of the divisions created in section
81-3113 include, but are not limited to, the following:
(1) The Division of Behavioral Health shall administer (a) the state
hospitals for the mentally ill designated in section 83-305 and (b)
publicly funded community-based behavioral health services;
(2) The Division of Children and Family Services shall administer
(a) protection and safety programs and services, including child welfare
programs and services and the Office of Juvenile Services, (b) economic
and family support programs and services, and (c) service areas as may be
designated by the chief executive officer or by the Director of Children
and Family Services under authority of the chief executive officer,
except that on and after September 1, 2012, the western, central, and
northern service areas shall be aligned to be coterminous with the
district court judicial districts described in section 24-301.02;
(3) The Division of Disability and Aging Developmental Disabilities
shall administer (a) the Beatrice State Developmental Center and (b)
-9-

LB733 LB733
2026 2026
publicly funded community-based developmental disabilities services;
(4) The Division of Medicaid and Long-Term Care shall administer (a)
the medical assistance program also known as medicaid, (b) aging
services, and (c) other related programs and services; and
(5) The Division of Public Health shall administer (a) preventive
and community health programs and services, (b) the regulation and
licensure of health-related professions and occupations, and (c) the
regulation and licensure of health care facilities and health care
services.
Sec. 6. Section 83-1201, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1201 Sections 83-1201 to 83-1226 83-1228 shall be known and may
be cited as the Developmental Disabilities Services Act.
Sec. 7. Section 83-1204, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1204 Department shall mean the Division of Disability and Aging
Developmental Disabilities of the Department of Health and Human
Services.
Sec. 8. Section 83-1206, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1206 Director shall mean the Director of Disability and Aging
Developmental Disabilities of the Division of Disability and Aging
Developmental Disabilities.
Sec. 9. Original sections 81-3113, 81-3116, 83-1201, 83-1204, and
83-1206, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, section 43-4413, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and sections 68-1530 and 81-1316,
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
Sec. 10. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
81-3133.02, 81-3134, 83-1216.02, 83-1227, and 83-1228, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska.
-10-